New Mexico, session 2026, HB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the local government division of the department of finance and administration for expenditure in fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years to allocate funding to local governments for the construction and installation of protective shade structures in rural public parks and other outdoor public-use recreation areas to reduce exposure to ultraviolet radiation, a primary environmental risk factor for skin cancer. The division shall prioritize project sites that demonstrate inadequate existing shade and significant ultraviolet radiation exposure risk in outdoor activity areas; that provide a feasible project plan, including design, cost estimates and time lines; and that propose cost-effective solutions that maximize ultraviolet radiation protection benefits. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. - 2 -